Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-375
Cost of patient care; failure to pay; action by Attorney General.

When any patient or relative fails to pay the amounts determined to be due under sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379, the State of Nebraska may proceed against such person in the manner authorized by law for the recovery of money owed to a creditor. The Attorney General shall represent the state in such actions, but may authorize the county attorney for the county in which such person resides or owns property to investigate and prosecute the action on behalf of the state.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 13, p. 3054;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 37.
July 18, 2026